Washington statutes.
RCW 9.91.150

Tree spiking.

(1) Any person who maliciously drives or places in any tree, forest material, forest debris, or other wood material any iron, steel, ceramic, or other substance sufficiently hard to injure saws or wood processing or manufacturing equipment, for the purpose of hindering logging or timber harvesting activities, is guilty of a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Any person who, with the intent to use it in a violation of subsection (1) of this section, possesses any iron, steel, ceramic, or other substance sufficiently hard to injure saws or wood processing or manufacturing equipment is guilty of a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) As used in this section the terms "forest debris" and "forest material" have the same meanings as under RCW 76.04.005.

[ 1988 c 224 s 1.]